Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2444
Qualification.

Prior to receiving letters, a personal representative shall qualify by filing with the appointing court any required bond and a statement of acceptance of the duties of the office.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 122, UPC § 3-601.

In the absence of qualification, the issuance of letters of personal representative as part of the appointment process is not authorized by this section. In re Estate of Severson, 310 Neb. 982, 970 N.W.2d 94 (2022).

Without acceptance by one appointed personal representative, there can be no qualification. In re Estate of Severson, 310 Neb. 982, 970 N.W.2d 94 (2022).